Utah statutes.
32B-2-201.5.   Commission subcommittee -- Chair's oversight responsibilities.

(1)  There is created within the commission two subcommittees consisting of members of the commission and known as the:

(a)  "Compliance, Licensing, and Enforcement Subcommittee"; and

(b)  "Operations and Procurement Subcommittee."

(2)  A subcommittee shall have four members, including the chair of the commission.  The chair of the commission shall appoint the members to a subcommittee.

(3)  The director shall consult with the chair of the commission over:

(a)  the internal affairs of the department; and

(b)  subject to Section 32B-2-207, hiring and firing of upper management of the department.

(4)  The commission by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall establish the duties of the subcommittees created under this section.

